Maryland, session 2025, SB0699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(u) (1) “Linear project” means a project [whose]:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0699*

SENATE BILL 699
(I) WHOSE configuration is elongated with nearly parallel sides and
used to transport a utility product or public service not otherwise contained in an
application for subdivision, such as electricity, gas, water, sewer, communications, trains,
and vehicles[. Linear projects]; AND
(II) THAT may traverse fee simple properties through defined
boundaries or through easement rights.
(2) “LINEAR PROJECT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PROJECT FOR A NEW
TRANSMISSION LINE OR NEW DISTRIBUTION LINE CONSTRUCTED ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
5–1602.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this subtitle shall apply to
any public or private subdivision plan or application for a grading or sediment control
permit by any person, including a unit of State or local government on areas 40,000 square
feet or greater.
(b) The provisions of this subtitle do not apply to:
(7) Any activity conducted on a single lot of any size or a linear project
provided that:
(i) The activity does not result in the cutting, clearing, or grading of
more than 20,000 square feet of forest; and
(ii) The activity on the lot or linear project will not result in the
cutting, clearing, or grading of any forest that is subject to the requirements of a previous
forest conservation plan prepared under this subtitle;
5–1606.
(a) (1) For the following land use categories, tracts having less than 20% of the
net tract area in forest cover shall be afforested up to 20% of the net tract area:
(i) Agriculture and resource areas; and
(ii) Medium density residential areas.
(2) For the following land use categories, tracts having less than 15% of the
net tract area in forest cover shall be afforested up to 15% of the net tract area:
(i) Institutional development areas;
(ii) High density residential areas;

SENATE BILL 699 3
(iii) Mixed use and planned unit development areas; and
(iv) Commercial and industrial use areas.
(3) Afforestation requirements must conform to the conditions in §§ 5–1607
and 5–1610 of this subtitle, including payment into the Forest Conservation Fund, if
afforestation on–site or off–site cannot be reasonably accomplished.
(4) (i) The afforestation requirements under this subsection shall be
accomplished within 1 year or 2 growing seasons after the completion of the development
project.
(ii) If afforestation cannot be reasonably accomplished on–site or
off–site, the requirement to contribute money to a Forest Conservation Fund under §
5–1610 of this subtitle shall be met within 90 days after the completion of the development
project.
(5) Linear projects that involve no change in land use may not be subject
to afforestation requirements.
(6) Solar photovoltaic facilities may not be subject to afforestation
requirements under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.